Utah statutes.
78B-5-606.   Certificate of acknowledgment as evidence of execution.

Private writings, except last wills and testaments, may be acknowledged or proved, and certified in the manner provided for the acknowledgment or proof of conveyances of real property.  The certificate of acknowledgment or proof is prima facie evidence of the execution of the writing in the same manner as a conveyance of real property.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

